Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1048
911 service system, defined.

911 service system means a coordinated system of technologies, software applications, databases, customer-premise equipment components, and operations and management procedures used to provide 911 service through the operation of an efficient and effective network for accepting, processing, and delivering 911 calls to a public safety answering point, including, but not limited to, 911 service, next-generation 911 service, and any emerging technologies, networks, and systems that allow access to 911 service.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1019;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 30.